dev/adjective/adjective.bn.dix
  <!-- বিজয়ী; বিজয়ী -->
    <pardef n="বিজয়ী__adj">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="adj"/><s n="mf"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- বৈধ; বৈধ -->
    <pardef n="বৈধ__adj">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="adj"/><s n="mf"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- স্বতন্ত্র; স্বতন্ত্র -->
    <pardef n="স্বতন্ত্র__adj">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="adj"/><s n="mf"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- স্বাবলম্বী; স্বাবলম্বী -->
    <pardef n="স্বাবলম্বী__adj">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="adj"/><s n="mf"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- নব্য; নব্য -->
    <pardef n="নব্য__adj">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="adj"/><s n="mf"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- আন্তরিক; আন্তরিক -->
    <pardef n="আন্তরিক__adj">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="adj"/><s n="mf"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- রূপান্তরিত; রূপান্তরিত -->
    <pardef n="রূপান্তরিত__adj">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="adj"/><s n="mf"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- যৌন; যৌন -->
    <pardef n="যৌন__adj">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="adj"/><s n="mf"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- যৌথ; যৌথ -->
    <pardef n="যৌথ__adj">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="adj"/><s n="mf"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- গরম; গরম -->
    <pardef n="গরম__adj">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="adj"/><s n="mf"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- নানারকম; নানারকম -->
    <pardef n="নানারকম__adj">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="adj"/><s n="mf"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- হাতে-কলমে; হাতে-কলমে -->
    <pardef n="হাতে-কলমে__adj">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="adj"/><s n="mf"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- সম্ভাব্যতম; সম্ভাব্য -->
    <pardef n="সম্ভাব্য/তম__adj">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r>তম<s n="adj"/><s n="psint"/><s n="sup"/><s n="mf"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- অপরাধমূলক; অপরাধমূলক -->
    <pardef n="অপরাধমূলক__adj">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="adj"/><s n="mf"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- সফলতম; সফল -->
    <pardef n="সফল/তম__adj">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>তম</l>
          <r>তম<s n="adj"/><s n="mf"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r>তম<s n="adj"/><s n="sint"/><s n="sup"/><s n="mf"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- মাঝারি; মাঝারি -->
    <pardef n="মাঝারি__adj">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="adj"/><s n="mf"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- প্রকৃত; প্রকৃত -->
    <pardef n="প্রকৃত__adj">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="adj"/><s n="mf"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- অংশগ্রহণকারী; অংশগ্রহণকারী -->
    <pardef n="অংশগ্রহণকারী__adj">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="adj"/><s n="mf"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- ঐচ্ছিক; ঐচ্ছিক -->
    <pardef n="ঐচ্ছিক__adj">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="adj"/><s n="mf"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- অপরিবর্তিত; অপরিবর্তিত -->
    <pardef n="অপরিবর্তিত__adj">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="adj"/><s n="mf"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- গর্বিত; গর্বিত -->
    <pardef n="গর্বিত__adj">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="adj"/><s n="mf"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- বাস্তবায়িত; বাস্তবায়িত -->
    <pardef n="বাস্তবায়িত__adj">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="adj"/><s n="mf"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- প্রচলিত; প্রচলিত -->
    <pardef n="প্রচলিত__adj">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="adj"/><s n="mf"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- সফলতর; সফল -->
    <pardef n="সফল/তর__adj">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r>তর<s n="adj"/><s n="sint"/><s n="comp"/><s n="mf"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- বিশৃঙ্খল; বিশৃঙ্খল -->
    <pardef n="বিশৃঙ্খল__adj">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="adj"/><s n="mf"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- আধুনিকতম; আধুনিক -->
    <pardef n="আধুনিক/তম__adj">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r>তম<s n="adj"/><s n="sint"/><s n="sup"/><s n="mf"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- স্বাস্থ্যসম্মত; স্বাস্থ্যসম্মত -->
    <pardef n="স্বাস্থ্যসম্মত__adj">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="adj"/><s n="mf"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- বিনামূল্যে; বিনামূল্যে -->
    <pardef n="বিনামূল্যে__adj">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="adj"/><s n="mf"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- নীরব; নীরব -->
    <pardef n="নীরব__adj">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="adj"/><s n="mf"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- বন্য; বন্য -->
    <pardef n="বন্য__adj">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="adj"/><s n="mf"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- সংক্ষিপ্ততম; সংক্ষিপ্ত -->
    <pardef n="সংক্ষিপ্ত/তম__adj">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r>তম<s n="adj"/><s n="sint"/><s n="sup"/><s n="mf"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- পুরাতন; পুরাতন -->
    <pardef n="পুরাতন__adj">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="adj"/><s n="mf"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- অনুরূপ; অনুরূপ -->
    <pardef n="অনুরূপ__adj">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="adj"/><s n="mf"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- নিঃসঙ্গ; নিঃসঙ্গ -->
    <pardef n="নিঃসঙ্গ__adj">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="adj"/><s n="mf"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- সংক্ষিপ্ততর; সংক্ষিপ্ত -->
    <pardef n="সংক্ষিপ্ত/তর__adj">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r>তর<s n="adj"/><s n="sint"/><s n="comp"/><s n="mf"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- আনুপাতিক; আনুপাতিক -->
    <pardef n="আনুপাতিক__adj">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="adj"/><s n="mf"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- মুক্ত; মুক্ত -->
    <pardef n="মুক্ত__adj">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="adj"/><s n="mf"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- পারমাণবিক; পারমাণবিক -->
    <pardef n="পারমাণবিক__adj">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="adj"/><s n="mf"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- অন্ধকারতম; অন্ধকার -->
    <pardef n="অন্ধকার/তম__adj">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r>তম<s n="adj"/><s n="psint"/><s n="sup"/><s n="mf"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- আধুনিকতর; আধুনিক -->
    <pardef n="আধুনিক/তর__adj">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r>তর<s n="adj"/><s n="sint"/><s n="comp"/><s n="mf"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- উচ্চতম; উচ্চ -->
    <pardef n="উচ্চ/তম__adj">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r>তম<s n="adj"/><s n="sint"/><s n="sup"/><s n="mf"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- সতর্ক; সতর্ক -->
    <pardef n="সতর্ক__adj">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="adj"/><s n="mf"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <e lm="বিজয়ী"><i>বিজয়ী</i><par n="বিজয়ী__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="বৈধ"><i>বৈধ</i><par n="বৈধ__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="স্বতন্ত্র"><i>স্বতন্ত্র</i><par n="স্বতন্ত্র__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="স্বাবলম্বী"><i>স্বাবলম্বী</i><par n="স্বাবলম্বী__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="নব্য"><i>নব্য</i><par n="নব্য__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="আন্তরিক"><i>আন্তরিক</i><par n="আন্তরিক__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="রূপান্তরিত"><i>রূপান্তরিত</i><par n="রূপান্তরিত__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="যৌন"><i>যৌন</i><par n="যৌন__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="যৌথ"><i>যৌথ</i><par n="যৌথ__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="গরম"><i>গরম</i><par n="গরম__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="নানারকম"><i>নানারকম</i><par n="নানারকম__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="হাতে-কলমে"><i>হাতে-কলমে</i><par n="হাতে-কলমে__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="সম্ভাব্যতম"><i>সম্ভাব্য</i><par n="সম্ভাব্য/তম__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="অপরাধমূলক"><i>অপরাধমূলক</i><par n="অপরাধমূলক__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="সফলতম"><i>সফল</i><par n="সফল/তম__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="মাঝারি"><i>মাঝারি</i><par n="মাঝারি__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="প্রকৃত"><i>প্রকৃত</i><par n="প্রকৃত__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="অংশগ্রহণকারী"><i>অংশগ্রহণকারী</i><par n="অংশগ্রহণকারী__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="ঐচ্ছিক"><i>ঐচ্ছিক</i><par n="ঐচ্ছিক__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="অপরিবর্তিত"><i>অপরিবর্তিত</i><par n="অপরিবর্তিত__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="গর্বিত"><i>গর্বিত</i><par n="গর্বিত__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="বাস্তবায়িত"><i>বাস্তবায়িত</i><par n="বাস্তবায়িত__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="প্রচলিত"><i>প্রচলিত</i><par n="প্রচলিত__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="সফলতর"><i>সফল</i><par n="সফল/তর__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="বিশৃঙ্খল"><i>বিশৃঙ্খল</i><par n="বিশৃঙ্খল__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="আধুনিকতম"><i>আধুনিক</i><par n="আধুনিক/তম__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="স্বাস্থ্যসম্মত"><i>স্বাস্থ্যসম্মত</i><par n="স্বাস্থ্যসম্মত__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="বিনামূল্যে"><i>বিনামূল্যে</i><par n="বিনামূল্যে__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="নীরব"><i>নীরব</i><par n="নীরব__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="বন্য"><i>বন্য</i><par n="বন্য__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="সংক্ষিপ্ততম"><i>সংক্ষিপ্ত</i><par n="সংক্ষিপ্ত/তম__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="পুরাতন"><i>পুরাতন</i><par n="পুরাতন__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="অনুরূপ"><i>অনুরূপ</i><par n="অনুরূপ__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="নিঃসঙ্গ"><i>নিঃসঙ্গ</i><par n="নিঃসঙ্গ__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="সংক্ষিপ্ততর"><i>সংক্ষিপ্ত</i><par n="সংক্ষিপ্ত/তর__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="আনুপাতিক"><i>আনুপাতিক</i><par n="আনুপাতিক__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="মুক্ত"><i>মুক্ত</i><par n="মুক্ত__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="পারমাণবিক"><i>পারমাণবিক</i><par n="পারমাণবিক__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="অন্ধকারতম"><i>অন্ধকার</i><par n="অন্ধকার/তম__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="আধুনিকতর"><i>আধুনিক</i><par n="আধুনিক/তর__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="উচ্চতম"><i>উচ্চ</i><par n="উচ্চ/তম__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="সতর্ক"><i>সতর্ক</i><par n="সতর্ক__adj"/></e>
